Tennessee, session 114, HB1930.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2360(e), is amended by
deleting "and each year thereafter" and substituting instead "and each January 31 thereafter".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1930
011697
- 1 -